Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.175

Violations—No penalty prescribed—Gross misdemeanor—Good faith exception.

(1) A person who violates, or knowingly aids or abets in the violation of any provision of this chapter, for which no penalty has been prescribed, and a person who fails to perform any act that it is his or her duty to perform under this chapter and for which failure no penalty has been prescribed, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) No provision imposing civil penalties or criminal liability under this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter applies to an act taken or omission made in good faith in conformity with a written notice, interpretation, or examination report of the director or his or her agent.

[ 2001 c 81 s 14; 1994 c 92 s 172; 1991 c 208 s 18.]